Arkansas statutes. Title 10 General Assembly
Chapter 3 Committees
10-3-203. Interim committees established — Members — Jurisdiction.

There are established within the legislative department of government the following interim committees of the General Assembly as aids in the legislative process in this state:

The Legislative Council, established pursuant to the provisions of § 10-3-301 et seq., shall consist of members of the General Assembly selected in the manner as is prescribed by law. The Legislative Council shall perform the functions and duties prescribed by law;

The Legislative Joint Auditing Committee, established pursuant to § 10-3-401 et seq., shall consist of members of the General Assembly selected in the manner as is prescribed by law. The Legislative Joint Auditing Committee shall perform the functions and duties prescribed by law; and

The following ten (10) subject matter interim committees of the House of Representatives, each to consist of the members who compose the respective standing committees of the House having comparable subject matter jurisdiction, plus such other nonvoting members as may be selected pursuant to the Rules of the House of Representatives, who shall be entitled to per diem and mileage for attending meetings of the committees:

House Committee on Education — matters pertaining to public kindergarten, elementary, secondary, and adult education, vocational education, vocational-technical schools, vocational rehabilitation, higher education, private educational institutions, similar legislation, and resolutions germane to the subject matter of the House Committee on Education;

House Committee on Judiciary — matters pertaining to state and local courts, court clerks and stenographers and other employees of the courts, civil and criminal procedures, probate matters, civil and criminal laws, similar matters, and resolutions germane to the subject matter of the House Committee on Judiciary;

House Committee on Public Health, Welfare, and Labor — matters pertaining to public health, mental health, intellectual and other developmental disabilities, public welfare, human relations and resources, environmental affairs, water and air pollution, labor and labor relations, similar legislation, and resolutions germane to the subject matter of the House Committee on Public Health, Welfare, and Labor;

House Committee on Public Transportation — matters pertaining to roads and highways, city streets, county roads, highway safety, airports and air transportation, common and contract carriers, mass transit, similar legislation, and resolutions germane to the subject matter of the House Committee on Public Transportation;

House Committee on Revenue and Taxation — matters pertaining to the levy, increase, reduction, collection, enforcement and administration of taxes and other revenue-producing measures, and resolutions germane to the subject matter of the House Committee on Revenue and Taxation;

House Committee on Aging, Children and Youth, Legislative and Military Affairs — matters pertaining to the aged and problems of aging; children and youth, military, veterans, legislative affairs, memorials, other matters whenever the subject matter is not germane to the subject matter of any other standing committee, and resolutions germane to the subject matter of the House Committee on Aging, Children and Youth, Legislative and Military Affairs;

House Committee on Agriculture, Forestry, and Economic Development — matters pertaining to agriculture, livestock, forestry, industrial development, natural resources, oil and gas, publicity and parks, levee and drainage, rivers and harbors, similar legislation, and resolutions germane to the subject matter of the House Committee on Agriculture, Forestry, and Economic Development;

House Committee on City, County, and Local Affairs — matters pertaining to city and municipal affairs, county affairs, local improvement districts, interlocal government cooperation, similar legislation, and resolutions germane to the subject matter of the House Committee on City, County, and Local Affairs;

House Committee on Insurance and Commerce — matters pertaining to banks and banking, savings and loan associations, stock, bonds, and other securities, securities dealers, insurance, public utilities, partnerships and corporations, home mortgage financing and housing, similar legislation, and resolutions germane to the subject matter of the House Committee on Insurance and Commerce; and

House Committee on State Agencies and Governmental Affairs — matters pertaining to state government and state agencies, except where the subject matter relates more appropriately to another committee, proposed amendments to the Constitution of the State of Arkansas or the federal government, election laws and procedures, federal and interstate relations, similar legislation, and resolutions germane to the subject matter of the House Committee on State Agencies and Governmental Affairs.

The following nine (9) subject matter interim committees of the Senate, each to consist of the members who compose the respective standing committees of the Senate having comparable subject matter jurisdiction, plus such other nonvoting members as may be selected pursuant to the Rules of the Senate, who shall be entitled to per diem and mileage for attending meetings of the committees:

Senate Committee on Public Health, Welfare, and Labor — matters pertaining to public health, mental health, intellectual and other developmental disabilities, public welfare, human relations and resources, the aged and problems of the aging, environmental affairs, water and air pollution, labor and labor relations, and similar legislation;

Senate Committee on Revenue and Taxation — matters pertaining to the levy, increase, reduction, collection, enforcement and administration of taxes, and other revenue-producing measures;

Senate Committee on Education — matters pertaining to public kindergarten, elementary, secondary, and adult education, vocational education, vocational-technical schools, vocational rehabilitation, higher education, private educational institutions, and similar legislation;

Senate Committee on Judiciary — matters pertaining to state and local courts, court clerks and stenographers and other employees of the courts, civil and criminal procedures, probate matters, civil and criminal laws, and similar matters;

Senate Committee on Agriculture, Forestry, and Economic Development — matters pertaining to agriculture, livestock, forestry, industrial development, natural resources, oil and gas, publicity and parks, levees and drainage, rivers and harbors, and similar legislation;

Senate Committee on Insurance and Commerce — matters pertaining to banks and banking, savings and loan associations, stocks, bonds, and other securities, securities dealers, insurance, public utilities, partnerships and corporations, home mortgage financing and housing, and similar legislation;

Senate Committee on State Agencies and Governmental Affairs — matters pertaining to state government and state agencies, except where the subject matter relates more appropriately to another committee, proposed amendments to the Constitution of the State of Arkansas or the federal government, election laws and procedures, federal and interstate relations, and similar legislation. The committee shall also have the responsibility of monitoring and making recommendations for periodic updating, modernizing, and revising the code of ethics for public officials;

Senate Committee on City, County, and Local Affairs — matters pertaining to city and municipal affairs, county affairs, local improvement districts, interlocal governmental cooperation, and similar legislation; and

Senate Committee on Public Transportation, Technology, and Legislative Affairs — matters pertaining to roads, highway safety, airports and air transportation, common carriers, mass transits, and similar legislation, and matters pertaining to science, technology, bio-technology, and similar legislation, and other matters whenever the subject matter is not germane to the subject matter of any other Class “A” or Class “B” Committee. The Senate Committee on Public Transportation, Technology, and Legislative Affairs shall serve as the supervisory committee over the preparation of the journal and the engrossing and enrolling of bills. The Senate Committee on Public Transportation, Technology, and Legislative Affairs shall have no jurisdiction of matters affecting the interpretation of the Rules of the Senate, but such jurisdiction shall be exercised by the Rules Committee of the Senate.

Members of the ten (10) interim House committees and the nine (9) interim Senate committees established in this subsection may also serve as members of the Legislative Council or of the Legislative Joint Auditing Committee.

Any member of the House who sponsors a proposal or resolution providing for a study which is referred to one (1) of the ten (10) House interim committees and any member of the Senate who sponsors a proposal or resolution providing for a study which is referred to one (1) of the nine (9) Senate interim committees may serve as an ex officio member of that committee during the conduct of the study resulting from his or her proposal or resolution.

The respective House and Senate committees may meet separately or the House and Senate committees of comparable subject matter jurisdiction may meet jointly.

A.C.R.C. Notes. Acts 2011, No. 1059, § 3, provided:

“INDEPENDENT MONITORING AND EVALUATION. The Arkansas Tobacco Settlement Commission shall file a quarterly progress report to the Public Health, Welfare and Labor Committees and shall hire an independent third party to perform monitoring and evaluation of program expenditures made from tobacco settlement funds. This independent third party shall have appropriate experience in health, preventive resources, health statistics and evaluation expertise. The third party retained to perform such services shall prepare a biennial report to be delivered to the General Assembly and the Governor by each August 1 preceding a regular session of the General Assembly. The report shall be accompanied by a recommendation from the Arkansas Tobacco Settlement Commission as to the continued funding for each program.

“The provisions of this section shall be in effect only from July 1, 2011 through June 30, 2012.”

Acts 2011, No. 1162, § 1, provided: “Interim study on cultural competence.

“The Senate Committee on Public Health, Welfare, and Labor and the House Committee on Public Health, Welfare, and Labor shall:

“(1)Study the increasing diversity of our state;

“(2)(A)Identify best practice approaches to cultural competency training with a goal of preparing state employees to interact most effectively with people of different cultures and ethnicities.

“(B)For purposes of this act, cultural competency includes four (4) components as follows:

“(i)Awareness of one's own cultural worldview;

“(ii)Attitude towards cultural differences;

“(iii)Knowledge of different cultural practices and worldviews; and

“(iv)Cross-cultural skills.

“(C)The training program studied under this act shall ensure that participants have increased cultural awareness and competence in their respective service field, including without limitation:

“(i)Cross-cultural communication;

“(ii)Culturally and linguistically appropriate policy considerations;

“(iii)Culturally competent service delivery;

“(iv)Health disparities;

“(v)Equity factors in the health systems; and

“(vi)Culturally and linguistically competent care supported by policy, administration, and practice.

“(D)The training developed and recommended under this act shall be designed to be offered electronically and through continuing education and various distance-education models and media so as to maximize replication and minimize expense for state employees and state institutions; and

“(3)Make recommendations on ways to inform health care and public health professionals on the National Standards on Culturally and Linguistically Appropriate Services and encourage the use of those standards.”

Acts 2011, No. 1162, § 2, provided: “The Senate Committee on Public Health, Welfare, and Labor and the House Committee on Public Health, Welfare, and Labor shall report their final findings under this act to the Governor, the Legislative Council, and the Arkansas Minority Health Commission on or before December 1, 2012.”

Acts 2012, No. 217, § 3, provided: “INDEPENDENT MONITORING AND EVALUATION.

The Arkansas Tobacco Settlement Commission shall file a quarterly progress report to the Public Health, Welfare and Labor Committees and shall hire an independent third party to perform monitoring and evaluation of program expenditures made from tobacco settlement funds. This independent third party shall have appropriate experience in health, preventive resources, health statistics and evaluation expertise. The third party retained to perform such services shall prepare a biennial report to be delivered to the General Assembly and the Governor by each August 1 preceding a regular session of the General Assembly. The report shall be accompanied by a recommendation from the Arkansas Tobacco Settlement Commission as to the continued funding for each program.

“The provisions of this section shall be in effect only from July 1, 2012 through June 30, 2013.”

Acts 2019, No. 551, § 1, provided: “Arkansas Legislative Study on Veterans Affairs — Creation — Purpose.

“(a)The House Committee on Aging, Children and Youth, and Legislative and Military Affairs and the Senate Committee on State Agencies and Governmental Affairs shall meet jointly to conduct the Arkansas Legislative Study on Veterans Affairs.

“(b)(1)The chair of the House Committee on Aging, Children and Youth, and Legislative and Military Affairs and the chair of the Senate Committee on State Agencies and Governmental Affairs shall call the first joint meeting of the House Committee on Aging, Children and Youth, Legislative and Military Affairs and the Senate Committee on State Agencies and Governmental Affairs to begin the study within sixty (60) days of the effective date of this act [July 24, 2019].

“(2)In order to interact directly with veterans throughout the State of Arkansas, the House Committee on Aging, Children and Youth, Legislative and Military Affairs and the Senate Committee on State Agencies and Governmental Affairs may hold meetings at various sites throughout the state.

“(3)Joint meetings of the House Committee on Aging, Children and Youth, Legislative and Military Affairs and the Senate Committee on State Agencies and Governmental Affairs for the purpose of conducting the study shall be held at least one (1) time every three (3) months but may occur more often at the call of the chairs.

“(4)The members of the House Committee on Aging, Children and Youth, Legislative and Military Affairs and the Senate Committee on State Agencies and Governmental Affairs shall be paid per diem and mileage as authorized by law for attendance at meetings of interim committees of the General Assembly.

“(c)(1)The purpose of the study is to examine veterans' issues within the State of Arkansas, including without limitation the occurrence of suicide among the veteran population in this state.

“(2)In carrying out the purpose of this act, the House Committee on Aging, Children and Youth, Legislative and Military Affairs and the Senate Committee on State Agencies and Governmental Affairs shall:

“(A)Study risk factors for suicide in veterans;

“(B)Review and research options for preventing or reducing the occurrence of suicide among the veteran population in the state;

“(C)Examine mental health care available to veterans within the state;

“(D)Conduct at least one (1) town-hall-style meeting to hear from veterans in the state and their concerns regarding mental health care and other issues affecting veterans in the state;

“(E)Engage the following:

“(i)The Department of Veterans Affairs;

“(ii)The Department of Health; and

“(iii)Mental health professionals licensed to practice in this state;

“(F)Review best practices among other states;

“(G)Review methods to create a statewide program targeting suicide prevention and preventative mental health care for veterans; and

“(H)Study and review other issues that the House Committee on Aging, Children and Youth, Legislative and Military Affairs and the Senate Committee on State Agencies and Governmental Affairs deem relevant to improving the productivity and wellness of veterans residing in this state.

“(d)The House Committee on Aging, Children and Youth, Legislative and Military Affairs and the Senate Committee on State Agencies and Governmental Affairs may establish an advisory board to assist the committees in accomplishing the purposes of the study as stated in this act. If the House Committee on Aging, Children and Youth, Legislative and Military Affairs and the Senate Committee on State Agencies and Governmental Affairs determine that creation of an advisory board would be beneficial, the House Committee on Aging, Children and Youth, Legislative and Military Affairs and the Senate Committee on State Agencies and Governmental Affairs shall adopt rules regarding the membership and duties of the advisory board.

“(e)The House Committee on Aging, Children and Youth, Legislative and Military Affairs and the Senate Committee on State Agencies and Governmental Affairs shall file a final written report of their activities, findings, and recommendations with the Legislative Council on or before December 1, 2020, and the study shall be complete upon that submission”.

Acts 2019, No. 565, § 1, provided: “Legislative Findings and Intent.

“(a)Determining the maximum number of employees and the maximum amount of appropriation and funding for a state agency each fiscal year is the prerogative of the General Assembly.

“(b)It is the intent of the General Assembly that the Transformation and Efficiencies Act of 2019 to reorganize state government shall result in efficiencies to reduce the duplication of services and administrative costs to reduce overall state government general revenue expenditures.

“(c)Cabinet-level departments shall identify and eliminate excess administrative expenses, unnecessary expenditures, and duplication of services and present those savings and efforts to operate efficiently to the General Assembly as necessary and appropriate.

“(d)(1)The secretary of each cabinet-level department created by the Transformation and Efficiencies Act of 2019 shall submit and present to a joint meeting of the Senate Committee on State Agencies and Governmental Affairs and the House Committee on State Agencies and Governmental Affairs two (2) weeks prior to the first scheduled day of the fiscal session of 2020, a report that includes, without limitation information that shows:

“(A)A summary of the proposed reduction in the total general revenue expenditures of the transferred state entities compared to the general revenue expenditures of the transferred state entities in the 2019 fiscal year by no less than one percent (1%);

“(B)The 2019 fiscal year general revenue expenditures for each state entity that has been merged, consolidated or otherwise combined;

“(C)The total amount of general revenue expenditures for the 2019 fiscal year by each cabinet-level department, including the identification of all funding sources of the cabinet-level department;

“(D)The total number of positions currently authorized for each state entity that has been transferred, merged, consolidated, or otherwise combined and a total for each cabinet-level department; and

“(E)A detailed statement of each cabinet-level departments plan to reduce general revenue expenditures and create efficiency including without limitation:

“(i)The elimination of certain positions;

“(ii)The reduction in operating expenses;

“(iii)The elimination or reduction of programs or services and the cost of the programs or services; and

“(iv)Other reductions in expenses or costs that may be identified.

“(2)The secretary of each cabinet-level department shall submit his or her report to the Governor or his or her designee for approval before submitting the report to the General Assembly.

“(3)It is the intent of the General Assembly that the secretary of each cabinet-level department under the direction of the Governor, has the initiative and resourcefulness to implement efficiency measures that benefit the State of Arkansas.

“(e)Funding for the Department of Education Public School Fund Account for kindergarten through grade twelve (K-12), Medicaid, or any state institution of higher education, board, commission, constitutional officer, or state agency that was not transferred, merged, consolidated, or otherwise combined by the Transformation and Efficiencies Act of 2019 as enacted by the General Assembly shall be exempt from the requirements of this section.

“(f)(1)The Senate Committee on State Agencies and Governmental Affairs and the House Committee on State Agencies and Governmental Affairs are authorized to meet jointly to review each cabinet-level departments plan to reduce general revenue expenditures as set out in this section.

“(2)The Chair of the Senate Committee on State Agencies and Governmental Affairs and the Chair of the House Committee on State Agencies and Governmental Affairs, or his or her designee, shall alternate the acting chair for the joint meetings required by this section”.

Acts 2019, No. 671, § 1, provided: “ATV Tourism and Trail Expansion Study — Creation — Duties.

“(a)The General Assembly finds that:

“(1)Arkansas offers an abundance of all-terrain vehicle parks and trails that attract nationwide all-terrain vehicle tourism to the state;

“(2)Many small businesses rely heavily on the tourism generated by all-terrain vehicle parks and trails;

“(3)A large number of the state's all-terrain vehicle trails are located within national forests, and riding all-terrain vehicles is one of the fastest-growing recreational uses of the state's national forests; and

“(4)State parks currently do not allow use of all-terrain vehicles on state forest roads.

“(b)The House Agriculture, Forestry, and Economic Development Committee and the Senate Agriculture, Forestry, and Economic Development Committee shall meet jointly to conduct the ATV Tourism and Trail Expansion Study.

“(c)(1)The chairs of the House Agriculture, Forestry, and Economic Development Committee and the Senate Agriculture, Forestry, and Economic Development Committee shall call the first joint meeting for purposes of beginning the study within sixty (60) days of the effective date of this act [July 24, 2019].

“(2)Joint meetings for purposes of conducting the study may be held at various sites around the state in order to study all-terrain vehicle tourism and existing and potential all-terrain vehicle trail sites. All meetings shall be open public meetings under the Freedom of Information Act of 1967, Arkansas Code §25-19-101 et seq.

“(3)Joint meetings for purposes of conducting the study shall be held at least one (1) time every three (3) months but may occur more often at the call of the chairs.

“(d)The purpose of the study is to make recommendations to the General Assembly regarding the creation, development, and implementation of a statewide all-terrain vehicle trails system utilizing existing state roads to connect forest roads and all-terrain vehicle trails in national forests in order to:

“(1)Increase all-terrain vehicle tourism and economic development in the state; and

“(2)Promote the economic well-being of small businesses catering to all-terrain vehicle tourism.

“(e)In order to fulfill the purpose of this act, the House Agriculture, Forestry, and Economic Development Committee and the Senate Agriculture, Forestry, and Economic Development Committee shall conduct a study to include without limitation the following:

“(1)The feasibility of creating a statewide all-terrain vehicle trails system;

“(2)Criteria for acceptance of an existing state road into the statewide all-terrain vehicle trails system;

“(3)Issues surrounding administration of the statewide all-terrain vehicle trails system, including consulting with the Arkansas Department of Transportation and the Department of Parks and Tourism; and

“(4)Similar all-terrain trails systems in other states.

“(f)On or before December 1, 2020, the House Agriculture, Forestry, and Economic Development Committee and the Senate Agriculture, Forestry, and Economic Development Committee shall file with the Legislative Council a final written report of their activities, findings, and recommendations, and the study shall be complete upon that submission”.

Publisher's Notes. Acts 1995, No. 1350 became law without the Governor's signature.

Amendments. The 2007 amendment, in (3), rewrote (A), added (B) and redesignated the remaining subdivisions accordingly, and substituted “nine (9) interim Senate” for “ten (10) interim Senate” in (C) and “nine (9) Senate” for “ten (10) Senate” in (D).

The 2019 amendment substituted “intellectual and other developmental disabilities” for “mental retardation” in (3)(A)(iii) and (3)(B)(i).

History.

Acts 1973, No. 90, § 2; 1979, No. 50, § 1; 1979, No. 97, § 1; 1979, No. 310, § 1; 1983, No. 709, § 1; A.S.A. 1947, § 4-1001; Acts 1989, No. 541, § 1; 1995, No. 1350, § 1; 1995 (1st Ex. Sess.), No. 10, §§ 1, 2; 2001, No. 960, § 1; 2007, No. 1581, § 1; 2019, No. 1035, §§ 6, 7.

10-3-204. Interim committee chairs.

The chair and vice chair of each House of Representatives standing committee which composes a House interim committee shall serve as chair and vice chair of the House interim committee, and the chair and vice chair of each Senate standing committee which composes a Senate interim committee shall serve as chair and vice chair of the Senate interim committee. If the House and Senate interim committees of comparable subject matter jurisdiction elect to meet jointly, the chair of the House committee and the chair of the Senate committee may alternately serve as chair of the interim committee in such manner as they agree.

History.

Acts 1973, No. 90, § 4; A.S.A. 1947, § 4-1003; Acts 1995 (1st Ex. Sess.), No. 10, § 3.

10-3-205. Staff — Assignment and duties.

The Director of the Bureau of Legislative Research shall have the responsibility of employing the necessary professional and clerical personnel to staff the interim committees. He or she shall assign, after conferring with the chair of each of the committees, such staff to the committees as may be needed to carry out the functions and duties of the committee, within the limitations of the staff available.

Staff personnel assigned to each committee shall assist the chair of the committee in preparing agendas, notices of meetings, undertaking research and writing research memoranda, taking and preparing minutes, reports, and recommendations of the committee and shall provide other assistance as may be necessary to assist the committee in carrying out its functions and duties.

If any interim committee finds that the staff assigned to that committee is inadequate or that separate or additional staffing is necessary on a temporary or permanent basis in order to enable the committee to carry out its functions and duties, the chair of the committee may file a request for additional staff with the director, who shall present the request to the Legislative Council for its consideration, or the committee may request the House of Representatives or Senate to employ the separate or additional staff pursuant to the authority granted in Acts 1995, No. 1312, § 20.

Publisher's Notes. Acts 1995, No. 1312, § 20 is codified as a note under subchapter 3 of this chapter.

History.

Acts 1973, No. 90, § 5; A.S.A. 1947, § 4-1004; Acts 1995 (1st Ex. Sess.), No. 10, § 4.

10-3-206. Meetings.

Each of the subject matter interim committees may meet at the times and for such duration as it deems necessary to properly carry out its functions and duties. If any committee shall find it necessary for the committee to meet in excess of twelve (12) days per year, it shall report the necessity for any additional meeting to the Legislative Council. If funds are available to hold additional meetings, the Legislative Council shall so advise the requesting committee.

The chair of each of the subject matter interim committees shall confer with the Director of the Bureau of Legislative Research in arranging meeting dates for the committees in order to avoid conflicting committee meetings and in order to assure maximum utilization of available staff and facilities for meetings of the committees.

History.

Acts 1973, No. 90, § 7; A.S.A. 1947, § 4-1006; Acts 1995 (1st Ex. Sess.), No. 10, § 5.

10-3-207. Ad hoc subcommittees and citizen advisory panels.

The various subject matter interim committees may establish ad hoc subcommittees and citizen advisory panels consisting of state and local agency officials and employees and interested citizens, but state and local agency officials and employees and private citizens shall not be entitled to any per diem or mileage for attending meetings of an advisory panel.

History.

Acts 1973, No. 90, § 10; A.S.A. 1947, § 4-1009.

10-3-208. [Repealed.]

Publisher's Notes. This section, concerning subpoenas, was repealed by Acts 2013, No. 1465, § 1. The section was derived from Acts 1973, No. 90, § 11; A.S.A. 1947, § 4-1010; Acts 2009, No. 1465, § 6.

10-3-209. Expenses of members.

The Director of the Bureau of Legislative Research shall be the disbursing officer of the funds appropriated for paying per diem, expenses, and mileage to members of the General Assembly attending regular and special meetings and other committee-related activities of the interim committees of the General Assembly as provided by law, unless specific provisions are made to the contrary.

Payments for per diem and mileage for attendance by members of the Senate and House of Representatives at meetings of interim committees shall be upon written claims filed therefor.

Cross References. Additional compensation for committee chairs, §10-2-215.

History.

Acts 1985, No. 273, § 8; A.S.A. 1947, § 4-1007.3; Acts 1995 (1st Ex. Sess.), No. 10, § 6.

10-3-210. Attendance at regional or national conferences — Reimbursement of expenses.

Members of the interim committees may be authorized to attend regional or national conferences of legislators or other public officials where attendance thereat will serve a beneficial legislative purpose. Members shall be entitled to receive reimbursement for reasonable and necessary expenses for travel, meals, lodging, and other authorized expenses incurred in connection therewith.

Attendance at the meetings shall be authorized by vote of the committee or in accordance with uniform rules and procedures established by the committees with the approval of the Legislative Council.

History.

Acts 1985, No. 273, § 8; A.S.A. 1947, § 4-1007.3; Acts 1995 (1st Ex. Sess.), No. 10, § 7.

10-3-211. Function during recess — Compensation.

If a regular session of the General Assembly is extended and the House of Representatives and the Senate recess for a period in excess of thirty (30) calendar days, the Legislative Council, the Legislative Joint Auditing Committee, and other interim committees of the General Assembly are authorized to meet and transact their normal business during the recess. They shall be entitled to per diem and mileage for attending meetings and attending to the official business of the committee to the same extent as during the interim between sessions of the General Assembly.

History.

Acts 1973, No. 810, § 1; A.S.A. 1947, § 4-148.

10-3-212. Rules Committee of the Senate and Rules Committee of the House of Representatives — Meetings — Compensation.

The Rules Committee of the Senate and the Rules Committee of the House of Representatives are authorized to meet jointly or separately at any time during the interim between legislative sessions as the Rules Committee of the Senate and the Rules Committee of the House of Representatives shall deem necessary or desirable to review the Rules of the Senate, the Rules of the House of Representatives, and the Joint Rules of the House of Representatives and the Senate and to make recommendations for revisions in the rules or new rules as the Rules Committee of the Senate and the Rules Committee of the House of Representatives shall deem appropriate.

The members of the Rules Committee of the Senate and the Rules Committee of the House of Representatives shall be entitled to receive per diem at the rate set for attendance at meetings of the subject matter interim committees of the House and Senate for attending subject matter or separate meetings of the Rules Committee of the Senate and the Rules Committee of the House of Representatives. Members shall also be entitled to mileage reimbursement as provided by law.

It shall be the responsibility of each of the interim committees to receive information and suggestions for new legislation or changes in existing legislation from the Governor, state agencies and departments, county and city officials, and from interested lay groups in the state within the subject areas of their respective committees.

Each of the committees shall make continuing studies of the programs of state agencies, laws of the state, and the general operation of government within the subject matter jurisdiction of the committee and shall make any recommendations regarding them as it shall deem appropriate.

History.

Acts 1973, No. 90, § 9; 1975, No. 289, § 1; A.S.A. 1947, § 4-1008; Acts 1991, No. 969, § 5; 1991, No. 1240, § 5; 1995 (1st Ex. Sess.), No. 10, § 8.

10-3-213. Requests for and receipt of information — Continuing studies — Agency assistance.

Requests for information or study or legislation received from the Governor or from other state agencies or departments by the Legislative Council may be referred to the appropriate interim committee for its consideration.

All state agencies shall furnish to the respective interim committees any information and assistance the committees may reasonably request.

History.

Acts 1973, No. 90, § 6; A.S.A. 1947, § 4-1005.

10-3-214. Committee studies — Duties of Legislative Council — Reports and findings.

In addition to the functions and duties of the Legislative Council which are prescribed by law, it shall be the responsibility of the Legislative Council, in order to coordinate the efforts of the interim committees and to avoid duplication of effort by the committees, to review and screen all study resolutions referred by the General Assembly and all study proposals sponsored by members of the General Assembly during the interim and approved by the Legislative Council. It shall either refer the study resolutions or study proposals to the appropriate interim committee for study or in unusual cases retain the study proposal or resolution and conduct the study. Nothing in §§10-3-201—10-3-208,10-3-212—10-3-214, and10-3-216, however, shall be construed to alter or diminish the exclusive interim and presession budget jurisdiction and authority of the Legislative Council as now prescribed by law.

The respective interim committees may initiate and conduct studies by motion or resolution adopted by a majority of the membership of the committee, but when an interim committee initiates a study on its own motion, it shall advise the Legislative Council of the study to be made in order that the Legislative Council may suggest ways to eliminate duplication of effort among the interim committees.

Each of the interim committees shall periodically report to the Legislative Council regarding studies referred to or undertaken by the committee and shall advise the Legislative Council of the status of each study pending before it.

Each committee shall file a copy of its minutes, final reports, and recommendations on each study with the Legislative Council. Findings and recommendations of the interim committees shall be advisory only and shall not be binding on the standing committees of the Senate and House of Representatives during legislative sessions.

History.

Acts 1973, No. 90, § 3; A.S.A. 1947, § 4-1002; Acts 1995 (1st Ex. Sess.), No. 10, § 9.

10-3-215. Study expenses.

(1)Whenever an interim committee of the General Assembly deems it necessary or advisable in connection with any interim study activity authorized by law or undertaken by the committee to hire consultants, actuaries, or special technical or clerical employees, or other assistance in connection with any such study, a written request shall be filed with the Legislative Council. This request shall outline the nature or purposes of the study, the need or necessity of hiring such special consultants, actuaries, or technical or clerical employees, or other assistance, and the estimated amount required for the assistance.

If the Legislative Council deems that uncommitted funds are available for that purpose and that the request for funds for hiring consultants, actuaries, or technical or clerical employees, or other assistance will serve a useful purpose and that the cost is justified, the Legislative Council, after seeking the advice of the interim committee which made the request, may proceed to employ such consultants, actuaries, or technical or clerical employees, or provide other assistance, and may make payment from the funds appropriated for interim committee study expenses.

The Legislative Council may use the funds appropriated for interim committee study expenses in the same manner as other interim committees as set out in this section.

It is the intent of the procedures set out in this section that the Legislative Council shall coordinate, control, and authorize expenditures for interim committee study expenses whenever the Legislative Council deems the expenditures to be in the interest of comprehensive studies or research projects authorized by law or by appropriate action taken by the respective interim committees.

History.

Acts 1985, No. 273, § 11; A.S.A. 1947, § 4-1002n; Acts 1995 (1st Ex. Sess.), No. 10, § 10.

10-3-216. Duties of Legislative Joint Auditing Committee.

In addition to the functions and duties of the Legislative Joint Auditing Committee, the Legislative Joint Auditing Committee shall furnish such information and assistance to the various subject matter interim committees as may reasonably be requested by the committees. When the Legislative Joint Auditing Committee in the course of its audits or other activities discovers any improper action or inaction by any public agency or department or the employees of any public agency or department, it shall be the duty of the Legislative Joint Auditing Committee to report the findings to the appropriate interim committee for study and investigation.

History.

Acts 1973, No. 90, § 13; A.S.A. 1947, § 4-1012.